Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-142] Military property; loss,
damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition. Any person subject to this
chapter who, without proper authority:

(1) Sells or otherwise disposes of;

(2) Wilfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or
loses; or

(3) Wilfully or through neglect suffers to be
damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of;

any military property of the United States or of the
State shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of
§2]

Revision Note

"Or" substituted
for "of" in section heading.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next